Kentucky statutes. TITLE XII Conservation and State Development
Port and River Development

154.80-100.
Statement of purpose.

The purpose of KRS 65.510 to 65.530, KRS 139.483, this section, and KRS 154.80-110 to 154.80-130 is to create within the Cabinet for Economic Development to aid in the promotion and development of river-related industry, agriculture, and commerce in Kentucky; to aid in the promotion and development of local port authorities as authorized by KRS 65.510 to 65.650; to aid in the promotion and development of industrial districts, parks, and sites for accommodating industrial complexes that utilize the rivers and river-related resources; to analyze, plan, and aid in systematically developing river-related resources by the development of services and facilities; to promote the development of industrial parks and terminal facilities for manufacturing and distribution industries for attracting and serving private and public enterprises that are directly or indirectly river-oriented; to promote the exportation of Kentucky made products in foreign commerce, especially as related to the utilization of the navigable waterways; and to establish the powers necessary or appropriate to carry out and effectuate the purposes of KRS 65.510 to 65.530, KRS 139.483, this section, and KRS 154.80-110 to 154.80-130.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 64, § 2; 1992, ch. 105, § 36, effective July 14, 1992.

154.80-110.
Establishment of foreign trade zone — Application for authorized — Organization under KRS Chapters 271B and 273 not prohibited.

The cabinet may make application to the proper federal authorities for the establishment of a foreign trade zone wherever and whenever such a zone is desirable. KRS 65.510 to 65.530, KRS 139.483, KRS 154.80-100, and KRS 154.80-110 to 154.80-130 will constitute legislative authority and approval of such applications, as required by federal law.

Nothing contained in this section shall be construed to prohibit any corporation organized under KRS Chapters 271B and 273 from being organized and chartered for the purposes of establishing, operating, and maintaining a foreign trade zone within this state pursuant to KRS 271B.18-060.

As used in this section, “foreign trade zone” means such a zone authorized by 19 U.S.C. sec. 81.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 64, § 9; 1984, ch. 305, § 1, effective July 13, 1984; 1992, ch. 105, § 37, effective July 14, 1992.

154.80-120.
Power to contract.

The cabinet may enter into any and all contracts in its own name for planning, engineering, promotion, and development, consistent with the purposes of KRS 65.510 to 65.530, 139.483, 154.80-100, and 154.80-110 to 154.80-130, and may enter into contracts for these purposes with any local port authority authorized by KRS 65.510 to 65.650 or any other public or private organization.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 64, § 10; 1992, ch. 105, § 38, effective July 14, 1992.

154.80-130.
Disbursement of funds.

The cabinet may disburse any and all funds appropriated by the Legislature for purposes consistent with KRS 65.510 to 65.530, 139.483, 154.80-100, and 154.80-110 to 154.80-130, any funds received from any state agency, and may apply for, receive, and disburse funds from the federal government, or any other public or private organization or agency for carrying out the purposes of KRS 65.510 to 65.530, 139.483, 154.80-100, and 154.80-110 to 154.80-130.

History.
Enact. Acts 1966, ch. 64, § 11; 1992, ch. 105, § 39, effective July 14, 1992.

154.80-140.
Riverport marketing assistance trust fund — Contributions — Purpose — Grants — Semiannual report.

There is created the riverport marketing assistance trust fund, to be administered by the Cabinet for Economic Development.

The riverport marketing assistance trust fund may receive appropriations, federal funds, contributions, gifts, and donations.

The purpose of the riverport marketing assistance trust fund shall be to promote and market Kentucky’s riverport to industrial, business, and commercial prospects, to attract economic development. To the extent funds are available, the fund shall make grants to riverport authorities for marketing activities, including research, advertising, participation in trade shows, and preparation of promotional materials. Grants shall not be used for activities such as salaries, administrative expenses, or internal newsletters.

Notwithstanding KRS 45.229, moneys remaining in the fund at the close of a fiscal year shall not lapse but shall carry forward into the succeeding fiscal year. Interest earned on any moneys in the fund shall accrue to the fund. Amounts from the fund shall be disbursed and expended in accordance with this section.

Grants under this section shall not exceed fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000) per project or thirty thousand dollars ($30,000) per applicant each year. Projects shall be completed within one (1) year of funding. To receive a grant, an applicant shall provide at least a fifty percent (50%) match, which may be obtained from any public or private source.

Grants shall be reviewed and awarded semiannually.
(6) (a)

Grants shall be reviewed and awarded semiannually.

The Cabinet for Economic Development shall submit all applications to the Water Transportation Advisory Board established by KRS 174.200 for evaluation and recommendations prior to awarding any grant funding under this section.

Higher priority shall be given to applications with a larger share of match money, for those where the match money has already been obtained, and for projects with a detailed riverport marketing plan.

The Cabinet for Economic Development shall on a semiannual basis submit a report detailing all grants awarded under this section to the Water Transportation Advisory Board, the Interim Joint Committee on Transportation, and the Interim Joint Committee on Appropriations and Revenue.

History.
Enact. Acts 2010, ch. 56, § 3, effective July 15, 2010.